District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.64

Transition of licensed and registered clinical laboratory practitioners.

For a period of 2 years after May 2, 2015, all references in this chapter to “clinical laboratory practitioners” shall be deemed to refer to persons meeting the requirements for licensure or registration in the District of Columbia, regardless of whether that person is licensed or registered.

History

March 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 764
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-272, § 2(f), 62 DCR 1911